Washington statutes.
RCW 36.53.110

Order of ferriage—Liability for nonperformance.

All persons shall be received into the ferry boats and conveyed across the stream over which a ferry is established according to their arrival thereat, and if the keeper of a ferry acts contrary to this regulation, the keeper shall forfeit and pay to the party aggrieved the sum of ten dollars for every such offense, to be recovered before any district judge having jurisdiction: PROVIDED, That public officers on urgent business, post riders, couriers, physicians, surgeons, and midwives shall in all cases be first carried over, when all cannot go at the same time.

[ 1987 c 202 s 209; 1963 c 4 s 36.53.110. Prior: Code 1881 s 3012; 1879 p 63 s 48; 1869 p 283 s 50; 1863 p 524 s 10; 1854 p 356 s 10; RRS s 5472.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.